src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! !!!Noun inflection
! ---------------

!! Nenets nouns inflect in cases.


LEXICON N_ӇЭ-RUS 
+Rus: N_ӇЭ ;
LEXICON N_ӇЭ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ӈэ:ӈэ 1  ProsSg -вна
!! no change in stem
!! ңэ ŋæ     ңэн’ ŋæn°h	ңэ” ŋæq	ңэ ŋæ
!! Yaml: __xo, ngaeTS__
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
!! +Pl+Nom +Abs
!! +Sg+Acc, +Sg+Gen, +Sg+Nom,
!! +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3
!! +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Даремʼ ;
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Дремʼ ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;
!! +Pred+Acc+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl1
!! +Pred+Gen+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, PxDu1, PxPl1
!! +Pred+Nom+PxSg1+Use/SpellNoSugg, +PxSg3, PxDu. PxPl.
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮVмна ;

LEXICON N_Ё  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ я:я 2 ProsSg -вна
!! Yaml: __ya, yaTS__
!! /total=3/
!! я ya	ян’ yan°h	я” yaq	ё yo
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
!! +Pl+Nom +Abs
!! +Sg+Acc, +Sg+Gen, +Sg+Nom,
!! +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScSg3
!! +Nom+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Даремʼ ;
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Дремʼ ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;

+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:%^A2O NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
!! +Pl+Acc X +Abs +PxSg. +PxDu. +PxPl.
!! +Pl+Gen X +Abs +PxSg. +PxDu. +PxPl.
!! +Pl+Nom X +PxSg. +PxDu. +PxPl.
!! +Pl+Nom+PxSg1+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3
!! +Pl+Nom+PxSg2+Der/Pr+V+Ind+Aor+ScPl3

+N:%^A2O NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮVмна ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮVмна ;

LEXICON N_ПИ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ пя:пя 3 ProsSg -вна
!! Yaml: __pyi, pyaTS__
!! /total=3/
!! пя pya	пян’ pyan°h	пя” pyaq	пи pyí
!+N: NMN_ПИ ;
!+N: NMN_МУНО ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Даремʼ ;
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Дремʼ ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;

+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;

+N:%^A2I NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ; !PLACCSUF_Zero
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮVмна ;

LEXICON N_ТЫ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ты: 4 ProsSg -вна
!! Yaml: __tyTS__
!! /total=4/
!! ты ti	тэ̇н’ ten°h	ты” tiq	ты tí
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
+N:%^VowLower NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
+N:%^VowLower NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N:%^VowLower NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N:%^VowLower NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N:%^VowLower NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;

+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ; !PLACCSUF_Zero
+N:%^VowLower NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮVмна ;



LEXICON N_ХАВО  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ха: 5 ProsSg -вна
!! Yaml: __tyTS__
!! /total=1/
!! ха xa	хан’ xan°h	ха” xaq	хаво xawo
!+N: NMN_ХАВО ;
!+N: NMN_МУНО ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Даремʼ ;
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Дремʼ ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;

+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
!+N:во MUNO_O ; 
+N:во NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:во NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮVмна ;


LEXICON N_СЁЁ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ сё: 6 ProsSg -вна
!! /total=0/
!!= * Yaml: __syoyoTS__
!! сё syo	сён’ syon°h	сё” syoq	сёё syoyo
!+N: NMN_СЁЁ ;
!+N: NMN_МУНО ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Даремʼ ;
+N: NEW-VARIANT-EQU_Дремʼ ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дами ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS-PRED-ACC/GEN/NOM_дми ;

+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
!+N:ё MUNO_O ;
!+N:е MUNO_O ;
+N:ё NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:ё NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;
+N:е NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:е NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;


LEXICON N_ИБЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ и: 7 ProsSg -вна
!! /total=0/
!! и yí	ин’ yín°h	и” yíq	ибе yíbye
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
+N: NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N: NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:бе NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:бе NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;

LEXICON N_ХАБИЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ хӑби:8ProsSg -вна
!! /total=0/
!! хӑби xəbyi	хӑбин’ xəbyin°h	хӑби” xəbyiq	хӑбие xəbyiy
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
+N: NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N: NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N: NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:е NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:е NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;

LEXICON N_ПАНЫ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ пӑны:пӑн 9 ы!ProsSg -(э)вна
!! /total=30/
!! пӑны pəni°	пӑнэн’ pənen°h	пӑны” pəni°q	пӑны pəni°
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
+N:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N:у NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:%^VowLower NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:%^VowLower NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;


LEXICON N_ХУСУВЭЙ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ хусувэй: 10 ProsSg -ювна
!! /total=17/
!! хусувэй xusuwey°	хусувэн’ xusuwen°h	хусувэй” xusuwey°q	хусувэй xusuwey°
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
+N:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N:у NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;


LEXICON N_ХАНО  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ хӑн: 11P ProsSg -увна
!! Yaml: __xano__
!! /total=27/
!! хӑн xən°	хӑнӑн’ xənən°h	хӑн” xən°q	хӑно xəno
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
+N:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N:у NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:о NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:о NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;


LEXICON N_ХАНО-SG
+N: NMN_ХАНО-SG ;
LEXICON N_ХАНО-PL
+N: NMN_ХАНО-PL ;

LEXICON N_ТИРЕ-RUS  
+Rus: N_ТИРЕ ;
LEXICON N_ТИРЕ  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ тир: 12 ProsSg -увна
!! /total=3/
!! тир tyír°	тирӑн’ tyírən°h	тир” tyír°q	тире tyírye
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
+N:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N:у NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:е NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:е NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;
!+N: NMN_ТИРЕ ;

LEXICON N_ЕД-RUS
+Rus: N_ЕД ;
LEXICON N_ЕД  !!≈ * __@CODE@__ ед: 13 ProsSg -увна /-ювна
!! /total=98/
!! ед yed°	едӑн’ yedən°h	ед” yed°q	ед yed°
!+N:° NMN_МУНО ;
!+N:° MUNO_O ;
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-NO-VOWEL-CHANGE-I2E ;
+N:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SGSCHWA-VARIANT-STEMS ;
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-DU-NOM_Каʼ ;
+N:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-SG-LOC_Кана ;
+N:у NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGPROSPXSUF_вна ;
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-SGSTEMS-LESS-SCHWA-VARIANTS ;
+N:° NEW-ODD-SYLL-PLVOWELVARIANTS-LESS-PROS ;
+N:° NEW-EVEN-SYLL-PLPROSPXSUF_ˮмана ;
!+N+Lim:ри NMN_ӇЭ ;

LEXICON N_МАРАӇГЫ-RUS
+Rus: N_МАРАӇГЫ ;
